Utah statutes.
17B-2a-903.   Additional service area powers -- Property tax limitation for service area providing law enforcement service.

(1)  In addition to the powers conferred on a service area under Section 17B-1-103, a service area:

(a)  may issue bonds as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 11, Local District Bonds, to carry out the purposes of the district;

(b)  that, until April 30, 2007, was a regional service area, may provide park, recreation, or parkway services, or any combination of those services; and

(c)  may, with the consent of the county in which the service area is located, provide planning and zoning service.

(2)  A service area that provides law enforcement service may not levy a property tax or increase its certified tax rate, as defined in Section 59-2-924, without the prior approval of:

(a) (i)  the legislative body of each municipality that is partly or entirely within the boundary of the service area; and

(ii)  the legislative body of the county with an unincorporated area within the boundary of the service area; or

(b) (i)  a majority of the legislative bodies of all municipalities that are partly or entirely within the boundary of the service area; and

(ii)  two-thirds of the legislative body of the county with an unincorporated area within the boundary of the service area.

